Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.075

Fees for issuing or renewing certificate of registration.

The department shall charge a fee of one hundred dollars for issuing or renewing a certificate of registration during the 2001-2003 biennium. The department shall revise this amount at least once every two years for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected by the fiscal growth factor under chapter 43.135 RCW.

[ 2001 c 159 s 14; 1983 c 74 s 2.]